test/src/morphology/Pron-teeg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - tēg: # pronouns 7 'eng /est teie/fin' - full paradigm
     tēg+Pron+Pl+Nom: tēg
     tēg+Pron+Pl+Gen: täʼd
     tēg+Pron+Pl+Par: tēḑi
     tēg+Pron+Pl+Dat: täʼddõn
     tēg+Pron+Pl+Ins: täʼdkõks
     tēg+Pron+Pl+Ill: tēʼži
     tēg+Pron+Pl+Ela: tēšti
